Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-803
Application; approval; when authorized.

If the proposed work of drainage or diversion will not result in injury or damage to any person and will not be otherwise detrimental to the public welfare but will result in economic benefit to the state, the Chief Water Officer shall approve the same by endorsement thereon. The Chief Water Officer shall make a record of such endorsement thereon in some proper manner in the Chief Water Officer's office. The Chief Water Officer shall also return the same so endorsed to the applicant. Such applicant shall, upon receipt thereof, be authorized to proceed with the work and to take such measures as may be necessary to its completion.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, § 3, p. 858;

C.S.1922, § 8482;

C.S.1929, § 81-6403;

R.S.1943, § 81-704;

Laws 1957, c. 365, § 16, p. 1240;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 227;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 250.